Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1204
Existence of judicial vacancy; determination.

In the event of the death, retirement, resignation, or removal of a district, county, or separate juvenile judge or the failure of a district, county, or separate juvenile judge to be retained in office or upon the request of a majority of the members of the Judicial Resources Commission, the commission shall, after holding a public hearing, determine whether a judicial vacancy exists in the affected district or any other judicial district or whether a new judgeship or change in number of judicial districts or boundaries is appropriate. If the commission determines a vacancy exists in a district or county court district, the commission may also make a recommendation to the Supreme Court of the site for a primary office location. The public hearing may include virtual conferencing or, if the judicial workload statistics compiled pursuant to section 24-1007 indicate a need for a number of judges equal to or greater than the number currently authorized by law, the commission may conduct a hearing by telephone conference. If a telephone conference is used, a recording shall be made of the telephone conference and maintained by the commission for at least one year, and the commission shall only determine whether a judicial vacancy exists in the affected district and make no other determinations.

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 47, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 2.